Utah statutes.
49-20-502.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Health benefit plan" means:

(a)  a health benefit plan as defined in Section 31A-1-301; or

(b)  a health, dental, medical, Medicare supplement, or conversion program offered under Title 49, Chapter 20, Public Employees' Benefit and Insurance Program Act.

(2)  "Pharmacist" is as defined in Section 58-17b-102.

(3)  "Pharmacy" is as defined in Section 58-17b-102.

(4)  "Pharmacy benefits management service" means any of the following services provided to a health benefit plan, or to a participant of the health benefit plan:

(a)  negotiating the amount to be paid by a health benefit plan for a prescription drug; or

(b)  administering or managing prescription drug benefits provided by the health benefit plan for the benefit of a participant of the health benefit plan, including:

(i)  mail service pharmacy;

(ii)  specialty pharmacy;

(iii)  claims processing;

(iv)  payment of a claim;

(v)  retail network management;

(vi)  clinical formulary development;

(vii)  clinical formulary management services;

(viii)  rebate contracting;

(ix)  rebate administration;

(x)  a participant compliance program;

(xi)  a therapeutic intervention program;

(xii)  a disease management program; or

(xiii)  a service that is similar to, or related to, a service described in Subsection (4)(a) or (4)(b)(i) through (xii).

(5)  "Pharmacy benefits manager" means a person that provides a pharmacy benefits management service to a health benefit plan.

(6)  "Pharmacy service" means a product, good, or service provided by a pharmacy or pharmacist to an individual.

